Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-111.5 Class 5 companies. (a)
A class 5 company under this article is one that is not a class 1 company, class
2 company, class 3 company, or class 4 company, and acts only as a reinsurer or
excess insurer, or both. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article,
a class 5 company authorized under this article may reinsure or provide excess
insurance, or both, for the risks and lines of insurance approved by the
commissioner.

(b) Notwithstanding section 431:19-107(a),
reserves for risks located outside of the United States reinsured or insured by
a class 5 company, upon approval of the commissioner, may be determined in
accordance with the required or approved reserve standards of the country in
which the ceding insurer is domiciled or the excess insurance risks are
located.

(c) Notwithstanding article 6 of this chapter
and section 431:19-110, where the risks reinsured or insured by a class 5
company are located outside of the United States, the class 5 company, upon
approval of the commissioner, may invest its funds in accordance with the laws
and regulations applicable to insurers or reinsurers domiciled in the
jurisdictions in which the risks are located, in proportion to the reserves
held for the risks. [L 2000, c 36, §1; am L 2003, c 209, §8; am L 2012, c 253,
§17]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next